Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
ADVERTISING

[§431C-21] Advertising. (a) A broker
or provider licensed pursuant to this chapter may conduct or participate in
advertisements within this State. Such advertisements shall comply with all
advertising and marketing laws or rules adopted by the commissioner that are
applicable to life insurers or to brokers and providers licensed pursuant to
this chapter.

(b) Advertisements shall be accurate,
truthful, and not misleading in fact or by implication.

(c) No person or trust shall:

(1) Directly or indirectly market, advertise,
solicit, or otherwise promote the purchase of a policy for the sole purpose of
or with an emphasis on settling the policy; or

(2) Use the words "free", "no cost",
or words of similar import in the marketing, advertising, soliciting, or
otherwise promoting of the purchase of a policy. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next